Arkansas, session 2025, HB1159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 4 is amended to add an additional
chapter to read as follows:

CHAPTER 120
RETAIL CONVENIENCE STORE SECURITY ACT

4-120-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Retail Convenience
Store Security Act".

4-120-102. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Retail convenience stores are convenient for both criminals
and consumers alike;
(2) Retail convenience stores have long been targets for
nighttime robberies and other crimes;
*ANS077*
01/15/2025 1:04:49 PM ANS077

HB1159
(3) It has been estimated by law enforcement officials that six
percent (6%) of all robberies of businesses in the United States involve
retail convenience stores;
(4) Employees in the retail trade sector are at a higher risk of
violence and homicide than in other industry sectors, and within the retail
sector, employees in gasoline stations or retail convenience stores are at a
higher risk of violence and homicide compared with employees in other types
of retail and the overall workforce;
(5) According to 2021 Federal Bureau of Investigation crime
data, there were over twenty-two thousand seven hundred eighty-eight (22,788)
incidents of violent crime that occurred at retail convenience stores in the
United States, double the incidence of violent crime that occurred at retail
convenience stores in 2017, and represented three percent (3%) of the
nation's total violent crime statistics for 2021;
(6) The increase in nighttime robberies and other crimes at
retail convenience stores heightens the risk of danger, exposure to violent
incidents, and crime to consumers and employees;
(7) Some states have mandated certain minimum security measures
at retail convenience stores to enhance and protect customers and employees
of convenience stores during the nighttime hours, including Florida, Maine,
and New Mexico; and
(8) Increased security measures can decrease the amount of
retail convenience store crimes.

4-120-103. Minimum increased security measures — Retail convenience
store — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "retail convenience store" means a
location used by an entity to conduct retail sales of miscellaneous consumer
convenience goods to the public.
(b) On and after January 1, 2026, a retail convenience store shall:
(1) Require a minimum of two (2) employees on the premises of
the retail convenience store between the hours of 9:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m.;
(2) Require a security camera system capable of recording and
retrieving images to assist in offender identification and apprehension;
(3) Have a drop safe or cash management device for restricted
access to cash receipts and post a conspicuous notice to this effect at the
01/15/2025 1:04:49 PM ANS077

HB1159
retail convenience store;
(4) Maintain a lighted parking lot illuminated at an intensity
of at least two foot-candle (2 lm/sq. ft.) at eighteen inches (18") above the
parking lot's surface;
(5) Post a conspicuous notice at the entrance of the retail
convenience store that states that the cash register contains fifty dollars
($50) or less;
(6) Maintain window signage that allows a clear and unobstructed
view from outside the building and in a normal line of sight of the cash
register and sales transaction area;
(7) Install height markers at the entrance of the retail
convenience store that displays height measures to aid in offender
identification;
(8) Develop a cash management policy to limit the amount of cash
on hand at all times after 9:00 p.m.;
(9) Conduct regular employee training;
(10) Maintain a silent alarm to law enforcement or a private
security agency; and
(11) Lock the business premises throughout the hours of 9:00
p.m. and 6:00 a.m. and only transact business through an indirect pass-
through trough, trapdoor, or window.

4-120-104. Penalty.
A violation of this chapter is punishable by action of the Attorney
General under the provisions of § 4-88-101 et seq.











01/15/2025 1:04:49 PM ANS077